Florida, session 2026, HB61.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 947.165, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
947.165 Objective parole guidelines.—
(1) The commission shall develop and implement objective
parole guidelines which shall be the criteria upon which parole
decisions are made. The objective parole guidelines shall be
developed according to an acceptable research method and shall
be based on the seriousness of offense and the likelihood of
favorable parole outcome by identifying an inmate's use of
vocation, education, and self-betterment programs and courses in
the department. The guidelines shall require the commission to
not aggravate or aggregate each consecutive sentence in
establishing the presumptive parole release date. Factors used
in arriving at the salient factor score and the severity of
offense behavior category may shall not be applied as
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb61-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 61 2026
aggravating circumstances. If the sentencing judge files a
written objection to the parole release of an inmate as provided
for in s. 947.1745(6), such objection may be used by the
commission as a basis to extend the presumptive parole release
date.
(2) At least once a year, the commission shall review the
objective parole guidelines and make any revisions considered
necessary by virtue of statistical analysis of commission
actions, which analysis uses acceptable research and
methodology. The statistical analysis shall be provided to the
President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives upon completion.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb61-00